Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 332.4. A. The Chair of the Pardon and Parole Board


shall be selected by the Board. The Chair of the Pardon and Parole


Board shall receive Twenty-four Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars


($24,800.00) Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per annum, payable


monthly, in the following allotment:


1. Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) for preparation for said such meeting; and


2. One Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-seven Dollars ($1,667.00)


Five Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-six Dollars and sixty-six cents


($5,666.66) for the regular monthly Board meeting.

Req. No. 2728 Page 1


B. The members of the Board shall receive Twenty-two Thousand


Eight Hundred Dollars ($22,800.00) Seventy Thousand Dollars


($70,000.00) per annum, payable monthly in the following allotment:


1. Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) for preparation for said such meeting; and


2. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) Four Thousand


Eight Hundred Thirty-three Dollars and thirty-three cents


($4,833.33) for the regular monthly Board meeting.


C. 1. Failure of any member to attend one Board meeting in any


calendar year, except for justifiable excuse as determined by the


Chair pursuant to written policy established by the Board, shall


preclude the right of the member to receive his or her monthly


compensation established by subsection A or B of this section.


2. In addition, any member who fails to attend two or more


Board meetings in any calendar year except for extraordinary


circumstances as determined by the Chair pursuant to written policy


established by the Board shall be deemed to have committed official


misconduct as such term is defined by Section 93 of Title 51 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. To initiate a removal from office pursuant to


this paragraph, the Board shall pass a resolution by a majority of


the members of the Board detailing the alleged misconduct. Such


removal shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 51


of the Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 2728 Page 2


3. Failure to attend meetings of the Board, pursuant to the


policy established by the Board, shall constitute cause for removal


pursuant to Section 10 of Article VI of the Oklahoma Constitution.


D. Board member positions shall be considered full-time and not


voluntary or part-time.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2728 CN 12/30/2025 10:48:22 AM

































Req. No. 2728 Page 3